Utah statutes.
67-4a-404.   Disposition of abandoned property -- Destruction.

(1) (a)  If, after an investigation, the administrator determines that any property delivered under this chapter has insubstantial commercial value, the administrator may destroy or otherwise dispose of the property at any time.

(b)  The administrator shall keep a public record of all destroyed property, identifying the property and the date and nature of the disposition.

(2)  The state, any officer or employee of the state, and the holder are immune from suit for or on account of any action taken by the administrator under this section.

